Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB827.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All school districts embracing designated cities together with the territory within
their limits, including any territory added for school purposes outside of the city
limits, and all independent graded common school districts having a school census
enumeration of two hundred (200) or more children, constitute independent school
districts, except those which have merged with a county school district since June
14, 1934. No independent district [other than a designated city ]shall continue to
operate when its average daily enrollment[school census enumeration of children]
falls below minimum enrollment requirements[two hundred (200) pupils] unless it
appears to the Kentucky Board of Education that the district can maintain a more
efficient program of school service by operating as an independent district as
demonstrated through evidence that includes but is not limited to the:
(a) District's student achievement, academic growth, school climate, and
successful student outcomes;
(b) Lack of waste, duplication, or mismanagement in the operation of the
district;
(c) Number of nonresident pupils who enroll into the district; and
(d) Projected impact from implementing a merger with a contiguous district in
providing an efficient program of school service and an adequate education
for the district's students.
(2) The minimum enrollment requirements shall be:
(a) Three hundred (300) in-person students for school districts providing no
service in any grade nine (9) through twelve (12); and
(b) Four hundred fifty (450) in-person students for school districts providing
service in any grade nine (9) through twelve (12).
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2308
(3) As used in this section, "designated city" means a city classified as a city of the
first, second, third, fourth, or fifth class as of January 1, 2014, under the city
classification system in effect prior to January 1, 2015. The Department of
Education shall, on or before January 1, 2015, create an official registry listing the
cities that qualify as a "designated city" under this section and shall publish that
registry on its website[Web site].
Section 2. KRS 160.041 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a board of education of a[an independent] school district desires to have its
district merge with[become] a contiguous[part of the county] school district, it shall
by motion so record its desire in the minutes of the board. The board, or its
executive officer, shall convey this request to the[ county] board of education of the
contiguous school district. At its next regular meeting, or at a special meeting held
prior thereto, the[ county] board of education of the contiguous school district shall
consider the[pass upon this] request.
(2) (a) If the[ county] board of education receiving the request refuses, or the two (2)
boards of education cannot agree upon such a proposition of merger[ of the
independent district with the county district], the question of merger shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the two (2) districts at the next regular
election if the question is filed with the county clerk not later than the second
Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(b)[(a)] If a majority of those voting on the question from each respective
school district favor merger, the school boards of the two (2) school districts
shall jointly develop a plan for adoption of the merger.
(c)[(b)] If the two (2) school boards cannot agree to the terms of merger within
sixty (60) days following the date of the regular election, the chief state school
officer shall develop the terms of the adoption of merger.
[(c) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, if the independent school
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2308
district cannot meet its current operating expenses from projected revenue and
if the two (2) school boards cannot agree to the terms of a merger, the
proposition of merger shall be submitted to the Kentucky Board of Education,
and the Kentucky Board of Education shall determine whether the two (2)
districts should be merged and if merged the terms thereto.]
(d) Upon completion of the plan for adoption of the merger, whether prepared by
the school boards or the chief state school officer[superintendent], it shall
become effective and the districts[independent district] shall merge[become a
part of the county school district] as set out in the plan.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a school district cannot meet its
current operating expenses from projected revenue and cannot negotiate a
merger with a contiguous school district, the Kentucky Board of Education shall
direct the merger of the insolvent school district with a contiguous district and
determine the terms of the merger.
(4) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures and terms for the
merging of school districts due to insolvency under this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/27/2026 10:41 AM Jacketed